Utah statutes.
53A-15-1206.5.   Withdrawal from an online course.

(1)  An online course provider shall establish a start date for an online course, including a start date for the second .5 credit of a 1 credit online course.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a student may withdraw from an online course:

(a)  within 20 school calendar days of the start date, if the student enrolls in an online course on or before the start date established pursuant to Subsection (1); or

(b)  within 20 school calendar days of enrolling in the online course, if the student enrolls in an online course after the start date established pursuant to Subsection (1).

(3) (a)  A student may withdraw from a 1 credit online course within 20 school calendar days of the start date of the second .5 credit of the online course.

(b)  An online course provider shall refund a payment received for the second .5 credit of an online course if a student withdraws from the online course pursuant to Subsection (3)(a).

(c)  If a student withdraws from a 1 credit online course as provided in Subsection (3)(a), the online course provider shall receive payment for the student's completion of .5 credit of the 1 credit course in the same manner as an online course provider receives payment for a student's completion of a .5 credit online course as described in Subsection 53A-15-1206(4).

